Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.410

Search and rescue activities—Distribution of funds for compensation and reimbursement of volunteers.

Funds received by the department specifically for the purposes of compensating search and rescue volunteers shall be distributed by the director to help fund medical and compensation coverage provided by this chapter and provide reimbursement by the state for: (1) Costs involved in extraordinary search and rescue operations such as search and rescue operations lasting over twenty-four hours where food and lodging for workers is necessary; (2) excessive transportation and rescue costs incurred by out-of-county residents which would not be otherwise collectible; and (3) compensation as provided in RCW 38.52.020(1)(d) as now or hereafter amended.

[ 1986 c 266 s 44; 1984 c 38 s 42; 1979 ex.s. c 268 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.